Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1546.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Representative Jerry A. Stern Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Jerry Allen Stern was born January 11, 1955, in Roaring Spring, Blair County.(2) Jerry graduated from Central High School in 1972 and attended Altoona School of Commerce, Penn State Altoona and the Altoona Bible Institute where he completed a three-year course in Bible Studies.(3) Jerry was elected to the Pennsylvania House of Representatives in 1992 where he honorably served the constituents of the 80th Legislative District until January 12345678910111213141516171819 6, 2015.(4) Representative Stern was a lifetime member of the Martinsburg Grace Brethren Church, where he served as a deacon and Sunday school teacher and sang with the Adult Choir and Maranatha Quartet.(5) Representative Stern also served as a lay minister for his church and for many other local churches.(6) Representative Stern also was a member of the Martinsburg Sportsmen's Association, the Blair County Chamber of Commerce, Blair County Farm Bureau and the Blair County Republican Committee.(7) Representative Stern was a longtime member of the local Rotary International, serving twice as President and as the Assistant District Governor.(8) Representative Stern also served his community as a board member for Nason Hospital and the Hollidaysburg American Legion Ambulance Service.(9) Representative Stern also enjoyed bowling, where he earned his professional card, gardening and playing softball as a longtime, proud team member of the world-famous Cobras softball team.(10) Representative Stern loved spending time with his family and sharing his faith with everyone he crossed paths with during his day.(11) Representative Stern passed away on December 11, 2024.(b) Designation.--The portion of Pennsylvania Route 164, Cove Mountain Road, from the intersection with Frederick Road in Taylor Township to the intersection with Agway Road in North Woodbury Township, Blair County, is designated as the 20250HB1546PN1823 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representative Jerry A. Stern Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the designated highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1546PN1823 - 3 - 123456